Massachusetts, session 194th, H3784.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 10 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 35SSS the following section:-
"Section 35TTT. There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth
a separate fund to be known as the Motorcycle Safety Fund for motorcycle safety related
activities. Such fund shall consist of all revenues received by the commonwealth under section
thirty-four of chapter ninety and which are specifically designed therein for said Motorcycle
Safety Fund.
All revenues credited under this section shall remain in said Motorcycle Safety Fund,
subject to appropriation to establish motorcycle safety related activities."
SECTION 2. Section 34 of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by
striking the words “(i) $2 from every motorcycle registration issued pursuant to section 2 shall be
of 2

deposited into the General Fund and used solely for the purpose of promoting and advancing
motorcycle safety;” and inserting in place thereof the following:-
"(i) $2 from every motorcycle registration issued pursuant to section 2 shall be deposited
monthly into a separate fund known as the Motorcycle Safety Fund for the purpose of promoting
and advancing motorcycle safety; provided, however, that the registrar shall provide rebates of
not less than $150 to persons under the age of 21 who successfully complete a motorcycle basic
rider course approved by the registrar pursuant to section 8 and that the total of such rebates shall
not exceed 20 per cent of the funds so deposited. All revenues credited under this section shall
remain in the Motorcycle Safety Fund to administer a motorcycle safety program, which shall
include, but not be limited to, funding registrar approved rider education courses and instructor
training, maintaining a policy manual that shall provide minimum requirements for instructors
and businesses that offer approved rider education courses in the commonwealth, the Motorcycle
Awareness Program in Section 13D of Chapter 71 of the General Laws, and public awareness
efforts. The State Treasurer shall not deposit such revenues in, or transfer such revenues to, the
General Fund or any other fund other than the Motorcycle Safety Fund. The State Treasurer shall
produce annually, an accounting report detailing income and expenditures relating to said
Motorcycle Safety Fund, deliverable to the Chairman of the Massachusetts Motorcycle
Association (MMA), the house and senate chair of the Joint Committee on Transportation, and
the clerks of the senate and house of representatives."
of 2